South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S684.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 Statewide Provisions Section 1-1-1910.  If any member of a state board or commission, or any member of a board or commission of any political subdivision of this State, including school districts, fails to take the oath of office set forth in Section 5, Article VI of the Constitution of this State, then the State Treasurer shall withhold any direct funding to the board or commission upon which the member sits, and that board or commission shall not receive any indirect funding appropriated in the general appropriations act. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----